North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 5. Property Rights of a Partner.

§ 59-54.
Extent of property rights of a partner.

The property rights of a partner are:

His right in specific partnership property,

His interest in the partnership, and

His right to participate in the management.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 24.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-55.
Nature of a partner’s right in specific partnership property.

A partner is co-owner with his partners of specific partnership property holding as a tenant in partnership.

The incidents of this tenancy are such that:

A partner, subject to the provisions of this Act and to any agreement between the partners, has an equal right with his partners to possess specific partnership property for partnership purposes; but he has no right to possess such property for any other purpose without the consent of his partners.

A partner’s right in specific partnership property is not assignable except in connection with the assignment of rights of all the partners in the same property.

A partner’s right in specific partnership property is not subject to attachment or execution, except on a claim against the partnership. When partnership property is attached for a partnership debt the partners, or any of them, or the representatives of a deceased partner, cannot claim any right under the homestead or exemption laws.

On the death of a partner his right in specific partnership property vests in the surviving partner or partners, except where the deceased was the last surviving partner, when his right in such property vests in his legal representative. Such surviving partner, or partners, or the legal representative of the last surviving partner, has no right to possess the partnership property for any but a partnership purpose.

A partner’s right in specific partnership property is not subject to dower, curtesy, or allowances to widows, heirs, or next of kin.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 25; 2000-140, s. 101(n).

Cross References.

As to survivor in joint tenancy for partnership purposes, see

G.S. 41-2

.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on joint ownership of corporate securities in North Carolina, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 290 (1966).

§ 59-56.
Nature of partner’s interest in the partnership.

A partner’s interest in the partnership is his share of the profits and surplus, and the same is personal property.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 26.

§ 59-57.
Assignment of partner’s interest.

A conveyance by a partner of his interest in the partnership does not of itself dissolve the partnership, nor, as against the other partners in the absence of agreement, entitle the assignee, during the continuance of the partnership, to interfere in the management or administration of the partnership business or affairs, or to require any information or account of partnership transactions, or to inspect the partnership books; but it merely entitles the assignee to receive in accordance with his contract the profits to which the assigning partner would otherwise be entitled.

In case of a dissolution of the partnership, the assignee is entitled to receive his assignor’s interest and may require an account from the date only of the last account agreed to by all the partners.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 27.

Cross References.

As to assignment of a limited partnership interest, see

G.S. 59-701

et seq.

§ 59-58.
Partner’s interest subject to charging order.

On due application to a competent court by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court which entered the judgment, order or decree, or any other court, may charge the interest of the debtor partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of such judgment debt with interest thereon; and may then or later appoint a receiver of his share of the profits, and of any other money due or to fall due to him in respect of the partnership, and make all other orders, directions, accounts and inquiries which the debtor partner might have made, or which the circumstances of the case may require.

The interest charged may be redeemed at any time before foreclosure, or in case of a sale being directed by the court may be purchased without thereby causing a dissolution:

With separate property, by any one or more of the partners, or

With partnership property, by any one or more of the partners with the consent of all the partners whose interests are not so charged or sold.

Nothing in this Act shall be held to deprive a partner of his right, if any, under the exemption laws, as regards his interest in the partnership.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 28; 2000-140, s. 101(n).

Cross References.

As to liability of limited partner to third parties, see

G.S. 59-303

.